California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) The department may, at its option, also use the electronic application developed pursuant to paragraph (1), as a means to enroll newborns into the Medi-Cal program as is authorized under Section 1396a(e)(4) of Title 42 of the United States Code. Providers may submit newborn enrollments through the electronic application on behalf of patients without a patient’s signature.

(c) (1) The department may designate, as necessary, Medi-Cal providers as qualified entities who are authorized to determine eligibility for preenrollment into the Medi-Cal program as authorized under this section.

(2) The provider shall assist the parent
 or guardian of the child seeking eligibility for preenrollment into the Medi-Cal program in completing the electronic application.

(d) The electronic application developed pursuant to subdivision (b) may only be filed when the child is in need of Medi-Cal.

(e) (1) The electronic application developed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall request all information necessary for a provider to make an immediate determination as to whether a child meets the eligibility requirements for preenrollment into the Medi-Cal program pursuant to the federal options described in Section 1396r-1a or 1397gg(e)(1)(D) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) (A) If the electronic application indicates that the child is seeking eligibility for no cost full-scope Medi-Cal benefits, the department
 shall mail to the child’s parent or guardian a followup application for Medi-Cal program eligibility. The parent or guardian of the child shall be advised to complete and submit to the appropriate entity the followup application.

(B) The followup application, at a minimum, shall include all notices and forms necessary for the Medi-Cal program eligibility determination under state and federal law, including, but not limited to, any information and documentation that is required for the joint application package described in Section 14011.1.

(C) The date of application for the Medi-Cal program is the date the completed followup application is submitted with the appropriate entity by the parent or guardian.

(3) Upon making a determination pursuant to paragraph (1) that a child is eligible, the
 provider shall inform the child’s parent or guardian of both of the following:

(A) That the child has been determined to be eligible for preenrollment into the Medi-Cal program.

(B) That if the child has been determined to be eligible for preenrollment into the Medi-Cal program, the period of preenrollment eligibility will end on the last day of the month following the month in which the determination of preenrollment eligibility is made, unless the parent or guardian completes and returns to the appropriate entity the followup application described in paragraph (2) on or before that date.

(4) If the followup application described in paragraph (2) is submitted on or before the last day of the month following the month in which a determination is made that the child is eligible for preenrollment into
 the Medi-Cal program, the period of preenrollment eligibility shall continue until the completion of the determination process for the applicable program or programs.

(f) The department shall seek approval of any amendments to the state plan, necessary to implement this section, for purposes of funding under Title XIX (42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq.) and Title XXI (42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq.) of the Social Security Act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law and only when all necessary federal approvals have been obtained, this section shall be implemented only to the extent federal financial participation is available.

(g) To implement this section, the department may contract with public or private entities, or utilize existing health care service provider enrollment and payment mechanisms, including the Medi-Cal program’s fiscal intermediary, only if services provided under the
 program are specifically identified and reimbursed in a manner that appropriately claims federal financial reimbursement. Contracts, including the Medi-Cal fiscal intermediary contracts and contract amendments, any system change pursuant to a change order, and any project or systems development notice shall be exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and any policies, procedures, or regulations authorized by these laws.

(h) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking any further
 regulatory action. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations, as necessary, to implement this section in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 111.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.75.

(a) The department shall conduct, or contract for the conducting of, a feasibility study report of technological requirements for modifying the electronic application authorized pursuant to Section 14011.7, known as the CHDP Gateway, to allow a person applying on behalf of a child the option to simultaneously preenroll and apply for enrollment in the Medi-Cal program or the Healthy Families Program over the Internet without submitting a followup paper application pursuant to the criteria set forth in subdivision (c).

(b) The results of the feasibility study report shall be provided to the fiscal and health policy committees of the Legislature on or before March 1, 2008.

(c) (1) The modifications to the CHDP Gateway that shall be the subject of the feasibility study report of technological requirements under subdivision (a) shall allow an optional electronic application for enrollment to be submitted at the time of applying for preenrollment, so long as written consent to exercise the option is obtained.

(2) The optional electronic application developed for the purposes of this section shall comply with all of the following:

(A) Be the simplest permitted by federal law to achieve the purposes of this section, except that nothing in this section
 shall allow self-certification of income.

(B) Be adequate to constitute an application for medical assistance.

(C) Request only the information that is necessary to provide the child with continuing preliminary benefits within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 14011.8 until a final eligibility determination is made pursuant to the federal options described in Section 1396r-1a or Section 1397ee(1)(D) of Title 42 of the United States Code and to the extent federal financial participation is allowed.

(d) The department shall consult with representatives of consumers, counties, and medical providers in developing the policies and procedures for the modifications to the CHDP Gateway that shall be the subject of the feasibility study report of technological requirements under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.78.

(a) The department may contract with public or private entities, or utilize existing health care service provider payment mechanisms, including the Medi-Cal program’s fiscal intermediary, in order to implement subdivision (b) of Section 12693.26 and subdivision (e) of Section 12696.05 of the Insurance Code, only if services provided under those sections are specifically identified and reimbursed in a manner that appropriately claims federal financial
 reimbursement.

(b) Contracts under this section, including the Medi-Cal fiscal intermediary contract, and including any contract amendment, any system change pursuant to a change order, and any project or systems development notice, shall be exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and any policies, procedures, or regulations authorized by these laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 29, Sec. 8.   (AB 102)   Effective June 29, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.8.

(a) Benefits provided to an individual pursuant to a preliminary determination as described in Section 1396r-1, 1396r-1a, or 1396r-1b of Title 42 of the United States Code shall end, without the necessity for any further review or determination by the department, on or before the last day of the month following the month in which the preliminary determination was made, unless an application for medical assistance under the state plan is filed on or before that date.

(b) If an application for medical assistance is filed on or before the last day of the month following the month in which the preliminary determination was made, preliminary benefits shall continue until the regular eligibility determination based on the
 application has been completed. The application shall be treated in all respects as an initial application for benefits and the following shall apply:

(1) In the case of an applicant who is found eligible for medical assistance, benefits shall be granted in an amount and under those conditions, including imposition of a spend down of excess income, as have been found applicable pursuant to the regular eligibility determination.

(2) In the case of all other applicants, provision of preliminary benefits shall end on the day that the regular eligibility determination is made.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, medical assistance pursuant to a preliminary determination as described in Section 1396r-1, 1396r-1a, or 1396r-1b of Title 42 of the United States Code shall be provided only if and to the extent federal financial participation is available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 112.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.9.

(a) On or before October 1, 2002, the department shall issue instructions to counties via an all-county letter or similar instructions to establish an automated system for tracking the status of applications received by county welfare departments from the centralized processing entity that accepts and screens applications for benefits under the Medi-Cal program for the purpose of forwarding these applications to the appropriate counties. Except for reporting denials of applications on behalf of children enrolled in accelerated Medi-Cal
 coverage pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 14011.6, the department shall not institute a process to require county welfare departments to routinely manually report to the Medi-Cal Eligibility Data System (MEDS) regarding the status of applications for Medi-Cal coverage prior to the development of an interface between that county’s automated eligibility determination system and the MEDS system for the purposes of implementing this section. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Health Human Services Data Center and the counties complete the automation changes necessary to implement the automated tracking system on or before July 1, 2003.

(b) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the department from requiring a county to report on the
 status of an individual application or to manually generate a report on a statistically valid sampling of applications pursuant to federally required monitoring activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 47.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14012.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the goal of the Medi-Cal program is to provide comprehensive health care to low-income Californians who cannot afford the cost of health care.

(b) (1) The department may seek waivers of federal Medicaid requirements in furtherance of this goal, including, but not limited to, demonstration projects that aim to either increase the number of Medi-Cal beneficiaries or enhance the medical assistance provided to beneficiaries.

(2) A waiver proposed by the department, which offers nonmedical benefits to Medi-Cal beneficiaries, including, but not limited to, employment or housing assistance, shall offer these benefits on
 a voluntary basis, and not as a condition of receiving medical assistance.

(c) Prior to applying for a federal waiver or an extension of a federal waiver, the department shall provide a public notice and comment period pursuant to Section 431.408 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, effective April 27, 2012, and any other subsequently developed federal requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 692, Sec. 1.   (SB 1108)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14012.5.

(a) By July 1, 2007, the department shall implement a process that allows applicants and beneficiaries to self-certify the amount and nature of assets and income without the need to submit income or asset documentation.

(b) The process shall apply to applicants and beneficiaries in the program described in Section 14005.30, the federal poverty level programs for infants, children and pregnant women, the Medically-Indigent and Medically-Needy Programs for children and families, and other similar programs designated by the department, in order to preserve family unity or simplify administration. The process shall not apply to applicants or beneficiaries whose eligibility is based on their status as aged, blind, or based upon a disability determination unless, to
 the extent possible, they are members of families in which a child, parent, or spouse of that person is also a Medi-Cal applicant or beneficiary.

(c) The director may modify or terminate the first phase of implementation not sooner than 90 days after providing notification to the Chair of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. This notification shall articulate the specific reasons for the modification or termination and shall include all relevant data elements
 that are applicable to document the reasons provided for said modifications or termination. Upon the request of the Chair of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the director shall promptly provide any additional clarifying information regarding the first phase of implementation as requested.

(d) Following two years of operation in two counties and submission of the evaluation to the Legislature, the director, in consultation with the Department of Finance, shall determine whether to implement the self-certification process statewide. This determination shall be based on the outcomes of the evaluation, including the ability
 to increase enrollment of eligible children and families, and to maintain the overall integrity of the Medi-Cal program. Statewide implementation shall be contingent on a specific appropriation being provided for this purpose in the Budget Act or subsequent legislation.

(e) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, federal financial participation is available.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations, as necessary, to implement this section in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(g) The department, in consultation with the Department of Finance, counties, and other interested stakeholders, shall determine which types of assets and income are appropriate for self-certification under this section.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be read to preclude a county from requesting documentation from any applicant or beneficiary regarding any income or asset where a question arises about such income or asset during the county’s determination or redetermination of eligibility following receipt of the application or annual redetermination form.

(i) Nothing in this section shall change the ability of the department to self-certify income, assets, or other program information to the extent allowed under state or federal law, waiver, or the state plan.

(j) (1) This section shall not be implemented if the voters approve Proposition 86, the tobacco tax initiative, at the statewide general election on November 7, 2006.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) if
 Proposition 86 is approved by the voters at the statewide general election on November 7, 2006, this section shall be implemented during the pendency of any legal action concerning the validity of the proposition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 56.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14013.

The department shall establish a system for investigation of a sufficient sample of applications and affirmations as shall be deemed necessary to assure the validity of such applications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14013.3.

(a) When determining whether an individual is eligible for Medi-Cal benefits, the department shall verify the accuracy of the information identified in this section that is provided as a part of the application or redetermination process in conformity with this section.

(b) Before requesting additional verification from an applicant or beneficiary for information they provide as part of the application or redetermination process, the department shall obtain information about an individual that is available electronically from other state and federal agencies and
 programs in determining an individual’s eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits or for potential eligibility for an insurance affordability program offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code. Needed information shall be obtained from the following sources, including any other source the department determines is useful:

(1) Information related to wages, net earnings from self-employment, unearned income, and resources from any of the following:

(A) The State Wage Information Collection Agency.

(B) The federal Internal Revenue Service.

(C) The federal Social Security Administration.

(D) The
 Employment Development Department.

(E) The state administered supplementary payment program under Section 1382e of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(F) Any state program administered under a plan approved under Titles I, X, XIV, or XVI of the federal Social Security Act.

(2) Information related to eligibility or enrollment from any of the following:

(A) The CalFresh program pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6.

(B) The CalWORKs program.

(C) The state’s children’s health insurance program under Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq.).

(D) The California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code.

(E) The electronic service established in accordance with Section 435.949 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) (1) If the income information obtained by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) is reasonably compatible with the information provided by or on behalf of the individual, the department shall accept the information provided by or on behalf of the individual as being accurate.

(2) If the income information obtained by the department is not reasonably compatible with the
 information provided by or on behalf of the individual, the department shall require that the individual provide additional information that reasonably explains the discrepancy.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, income information obtained by the department is reasonably compatible with information provided by or on behalf of an individual if any of the following conditions are met:

(A) Both state that the individual’s income is above the applicable income standard or other relevant income threshold for eligibility.

(B) Both state that the individual’s income is at or below the applicable income standard or other relevant income threshold for eligibility.

(C) The information provided by or on behalf of the individual states that the individual’s
 income is above, and the information obtained by the department states that the individual’s income is at or below, the applicable income standard or other relevant income threshold for eligibility.

(4) If subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) applies, the individual shall be informed that the income information provided by them was higher than the information that was electronically verified and that they may request a reconciliation of the difference. This paragraph shall be implemented no later than January 1, 2015.

(d) (1) The department shall accept the attestation of the individual regarding whether they are pregnant unless the department has information that is not reasonably compatible with the attestation.

(2) If the information obtained by the department is not reasonably compatible with
 the information provided by or on behalf of the individual under paragraph (1), the department shall require that the individual provide additional information that reasonably explains the discrepancy.

(e) If any information not described in subdivision (c) or (d) that is needed for an eligibility determination or redetermination and is obtained by the department is not reasonably compatible with the information provided by or on behalf of the individual, the department shall require that the individual provide additional information that reasonably explains the discrepancy.

(f) The department shall develop, and update as it is modified, a verification plan describing the verification policies and procedures adopted by the department to verify eligibility information. If the department determines that any state or federal agencies or programs not previously identified in the
 verification plan are useful in determining an individual’s eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits or for potential eligibility, for an insurance affordability program offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange, the department shall update the verification plan to identify those additional agencies or programs. The development and modification of the verification plan shall be undertaken in consultation with representatives from county human services departments, legal aid advocates, and the Legislature. This verification plan shall conform to all federal requirements and shall be posted on the department’s internet website.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins,
 or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(h) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 113) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 86.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14013.3.

(a) When determining whether an individual is eligible for Medi-Cal benefits, the department shall verify the accuracy of the information identified in this section that is provided as a part of the application or redetermination process in conformity with this section.

(b) Before requesting additional verification from an applicant or beneficiary for information they provide as part of the application or redetermination process, the department shall obtain information about an individual that is available electronically from other state and federal agencies and programs in determining an individual’s eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits or for potential eligibility for an insurance affordability program offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange
 established pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code. Needed information shall be obtained from the following sources, including any other source the department determines is useful:

(1) Information related to wages, net earnings from self-employment, and unearned income from any of the following:

(A) The State Wage Information Collection Agency.

(B) The federal Internal Revenue Service.

(C) The federal Social Security Administration.

(D) The Employment Development Department.

(E) The state administered supplementary payment program under Section 1382e of Title 42 of the United States
 Code.

(F) Any state program administered under a plan approved under Titles I, X, XIV, or XVI of the federal Social Security Act.

(2) Information related to eligibility or enrollment from any of the following:

(A) The CalFresh program pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6.

(B) The CalWORKs program.

(C) The state’s children’s health insurance program under Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq.).

(D) The California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code.

(E) The electronic service established in accordance with Section 435.949 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) (1) If the income information obtained by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) is reasonably compatible with the information provided by or on behalf of the individual, the department shall accept the information provided by or on behalf of the individual as being accurate.

(2) If the income information obtained by the department is not reasonably compatible with the information provided by or on behalf of the individual, the department shall require that the individual provide additional information that reasonably explains the discrepancy.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, income information
 obtained by the department is reasonably compatible with information provided by or on behalf of an individual if any of the following conditions are met:

(A) Both state that the individual’s income is above the applicable income standard or other relevant income threshold for eligibility.

(B) Both state that the individual’s income is at or below the applicable income standard or other relevant income threshold for eligibility.

(C) The information provided by or on behalf of the individual states that the individual’s income is above, and the information obtained by the department states that the individual’s income is at or below, the applicable income standard or other relevant income threshold for eligibility.

(4) If subparagraph (C) of paragraph
 (3) applies, the individual shall be informed that the income information provided by them was higher than the information that was electronically verified and that they may request a reconciliation of the difference. This paragraph shall be implemented no later than January 1, 2015.

(d) (1) The department shall accept the attestation of the individual regarding whether they are pregnant unless the department has information that is not reasonably compatible with the attestation.

(2) If the information obtained by the department is not reasonably compatible with the information provided by or on behalf of the individual under paragraph (1), the department shall require that the individual provide additional information that reasonably explains the discrepancy.

(e) If any information not
 described in subdivision (c) or (d) that is needed for an eligibility determination or redetermination and is obtained by the department is not reasonably compatible with the information provided by or on behalf of the individual, the department shall require that the individual provide additional information that reasonably explains the discrepancy.

(f) The department shall develop, and update as it is modified, a verification plan describing the verification policies and procedures adopted by the department to verify eligibility information. If the department determines that any state or federal agencies or programs not previously identified in the verification plan are useful in determining an individual’s eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits or for potential eligibility, for an insurance affordability program offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange, the department shall update the verification plan to identify those additional
 agencies or programs. The development and modification of the verification plan shall be undertaken in consultation with representatives from county human services departments, legal aid advocates, and the Legislature. This verification plan shall conform to all federal requirements and shall be posted on the department’s internet website.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the effective
 date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis until regulations have been adopted.

(h) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(i) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 114) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 87.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 86 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14013.5.

(a) Pursuant to, and only to the extent required by, Section 1940 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396w) and subject to the provisions of this section, the department shall implement an asset verification program for the purpose of determining or redetermining the eligibility of an applicant for, or recipient of, Medi-Cal benefits on the basis of being aged, blind, or disabled.

(b) (1) Any applicant or recipient described in subdivision
 (a), and any other person whose resources are required by law to be disclosed to determine the eligibility of the applicant or recipient, shall provide authorization for the department to obtain from any financial institution any financial record held by the institution with respect to the applicant or recipient, and any other person, as applicable, whenever the department determines the record is needed in connection with a determination with respect to the eligibility for, or the amount or extent of, the medical assistance.

(2) The department’s obtaining of financial records pursuant to this section shall be subject to the cost reimbursement requirements of Section 1115(a) of the federal Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 3415(a)) and shall be at no cost to the applicant, recipient, or any other person.

(3) An authorization under this subdivision shall not be
 required for any applicant or recipient whose assets have been verified by the federal Social Security Administration.

(4) An authorization under this subdivision shall only be required for those applicants and recipients as required by federal law and federal guidance.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Financial institution” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1101(1) of the federal Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 3401(1)).

(2) “Financial record” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1101(2) of the federal Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 3401(2)).

(3) “Any other person” shall mean the spouse of an applicant or recipient, a parent
 of an unemancipated minor, or any other person whose resources are required by federal law to be disclosed to determine the eligibility of the applicant or recipient.

(d) An authorization provided to the department under subdivision (b) shall remain effective until the earlier of:

(1) The rendering of a final adverse decision on the applicant’s application for medical assistance.

(2) The cessation of the recipient’s eligibility for the medical assistance.

(3) The express revocation by the applicant or recipient, or other required person, as applicable, of the authorization, in a written notification to the department.

(e) (1) An authorization obtained by the
 department under subdivision (b) shall be considered as meeting the requirements of Section 1103(a) of the federal Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 3403(a)) and, notwithstanding Section 1104(a) of the federal Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 3404(a)), need not be furnished to the financial institution.

(2) The certification requirements of Section 1103(b) of the federal Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 3403(b)) shall not apply to requests by the department or its designee pursuant to an authorization provided under subdivision (b).

(3) A request by the department or its designee pursuant to an authorization provided under subdivision (b) shall be deemed to meet the requirements of Section 1104(a)(3) of the federal Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 3404(a)(3)) and of Section 1102 of the act (12
 U.S.C. Sec. 3402), relating to a reasonable description of financial records.

(f) If an applicant for, or recipient of, medical assistance, or other required person, as applicable, refuses to provide, or revokes, any authorization made by the applicant or recipient, or other required person, as applicable, for the department to obtain from any financial institution any financial record, the department may, on that basis, determine that the applicant or recipient is ineligible for medical assistance.

(g) The department shall provide the applicant or recipient with notice of the asset verification requirement of this section, including privacy protections and the duration and scope of the authorization, prior to the applicant or recipient being requested to provide the authorization required by subdivision (b).

(h) The
 department shall, in coordination with the counties and advocates, develop criteria regarding how and when the authorization required under subdivision (b) will be required, how and when verification will be required, what standards will be used, and the content of the notice to the applicants and recipients described in subdivision (g) concerning the authorization.

(i) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement, without taking any regulatory action, this section by means of an all-county letter or similar instruction. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(j) To implement this section, the
 department may contract with public or private entities that shall be subject to the same requirements and limitations on use and disclosure of information as would apply if the department were to implement this section directly. In order to demonstrate good faith efforts to meet federal implementation requirements of Section 1940 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396w) and to avoid any withholding of federal financial participation, the Legislature hereby determines that an expedited contract process for contracts under this section is necessary. Therefore, contracts under this section shall be exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and any policies, procedures, or regulations authorized by that part. Contracts under this section shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 34.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14014.

(a) Any person receiving health care for which he or she was not eligible on the basis of false declarations as to his or her eligibility or any person making false declarations as to eligibility on behalf of any other person receiving health care for which that other person was not eligible shall be liable for repayment and shall be guilty of a misdemeanor or felony depending on the amount paid on his or her behalf for which he or she was not eligible, as specified in Section 487 of the Penal Code.

(b) (1) Any person who willfully and knowingly counsels or encourages any individual to make false statements or otherwise causes false statements to be made on an application, in order to receive health care services to which the applicant is not entitled, shall be liable to the Medi-Cal program for damages incurred for the cost of services rendered to the applicant.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall be implemented to the extent permitted by federal law and to the extent that implementation of paragraph (1) does not affect the availability of federal financial participation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 837, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14014.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to protect individual privacy and the integrity of Medi-Cal and other insurance affordability programs by restricting the disclosure of personal identifying information to prevent identity theft, abuse, or fraud in situations where an insurance affordability program applicant or beneficiary appoints an authorized representative to assist him or her in obtaining health care benefits.

(b) The department, in consultation with the California Health Benefit Exchange, shall implement policies and prescribe forms, notices, and other safeguards to ensure the privacy and protection of the rights of applicants who appoint an authorized representative consistent with the provisions of Section 1902 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a) and Section 435.908 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) All insurance affordability programs shall obtain completed authorization forms pursuant to subdivision (b) prior to making the final determination concerning the eligibility or renewal to which the authorization applies.
